Washington statutes.
RCW 18.44.181

Proof of licensure prerequisite to action for fee.

No person engaged in the business or acting in the capacity of an escrow agent may bring or maintain any action in any court of this state for the collection or compensation for the performances of any services entered upon after December 31, 1965, for which licensing is required under this chapter without alleging and proving that he or she was a duly licensed escrow agent at the time of commencement of such services.

[ 1999 c 30 s 20; 1965 c 153 s 19. Formerly RCW 18.44.180.]